Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1234.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Coverage for Blood Pressure Monitors.--(a) A government program shall provide coverage for medically necessary home blood pressure monitors that have been validated for clinical accuracy for pregnant or postpartum enrollees for each pregnancy NOT MORE FREQUENTLY THAN ONCE EVERY TWO YEARS . (b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless <--<--12345678910111213141516 the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Enrollee." An individual entitled to receive health care services under a government program."Government program." A program of government-sponsored or government-subsidized health care coverage, including:(1) The children's health insurance program under Article XXIII-A of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as "The Insurance Company Law of 1921."(2) A program specified under this subdivision."Postpartum." Within one year of delivery or the end of pregnancy.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1234PN2054 - 2 - 123456789101112